Hawaii statutes.
§321-198 State funding of substance abuse
agencies. Certification of a private substance abuse agency pursuant to
section 321-193(10), shall be a necessary prerequisite to that substance abuse
agency receiving any state funding. This section shall take effect on
December 31, 1979. [L 1977, c 108, §2; am L 1978, c 68, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next